tests/feature/test-anonpat-filter.lexd
PATTERNS
(Adj Noun)[nofruit,-nocolor]
(Adj Noun)[-nofruit,nocolor]

LEXICON Adj
bright[nofruit]
green
tasty[nocolor]
impetuous[nofruit,nocolor]

LEXICON Noun
apple[nocolor]
orange
green[nofruit]
cat[nofruit,nocolor]
